Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Contract Development.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent regarding the content of contracts awarded under this chapter that relate to the use of project labor agreements and the reopening of a contract by any party, see § 1, ch. 4, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 43.82.200.
Contract development.

If the commissioner approves an application and proposed project plan under AS

43.82.140

, the commissioner may develop a contract that may include

terms concerning periodic payment in lieu of one or more taxes as provided in AS

43.82.210

;

terms developed under AS

43.82.220

relating to

timing and notice of the state’s right to take royalty in kind or in value; and

royalty value;

terms regarding the hiring of Alaska residents and contracting with Alaska businesses under AS

43.82.230

;

terms regarding periodic payment to, or an equity or other interest in a project for, municipalities under AS

43.82.500

;

terms regarding arbitration or alternative dispute resolution procedures;

terms and conditions for administrative termination of a contract under AS

43.82.445

; and

other terms or conditions that are

necessary to further the purposes of this chapter; or

in the best interests of the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.210.
Contract terms relating to payment in lieu of one or more taxes.

If the commissioner approves an application and proposed project plan under AS

43.82.140

, the commissioner may develop proposed terms for inclusion in a contract under AS

43.82.020

for periodic payment in lieu of one or more of the following taxes that otherwise would be imposed by the state or a municipality on the qualified sponsor or member of a qualified sponsor group as a consequence of participating in an approved qualified project:

oil and gas production taxes and oil surcharges under AS 43.55;

oil and gas exploration, production, and pipeline transportation property taxes under AS 43.56;

[Repealed, § 6 ch 34 SLA 1999.]

Alaska net income tax under AS 43.20;

municipal sales and use tax under AS

29.45.650

—

29.45.710

;

municipal property tax under AS

29.45.010

—

29.45.250

or

29.45.550

—

29.45.600

;

municipal special assessments under AS 29.46;

a comparable tax or levy imposed by the state or a municipality after June 18, 1998;

other state or municipal taxes or categories of taxes identified by the commissioner.

If the commissioner chooses to develop proposed terms under (a) of this section, the commissioner shall, if practicable and consistent with the long-term fiscal interests of the state, develop the terms in a manner that attempts to balance the following principles:

the terms should, in conjunction with other factors such as cost reduction of the project, cost overrun risk reduction of the project, increased fiscal certainty, and successful marketing, improve the competitiveness of the approved qualified project in relation to other development efforts aimed at supplying the same market;

the terms should accommodate the interests of the state, affected municipalities, and the project sponsors under a wide range of economic conditions, potential project structures, and marketing arrangements;

the state’s and affected municipalities’ combined share of the economic rent of the approved qualified project under the contract should be relatively progressive; that is, the state’s and affected municipalities’ combined annual share of the economic rent of the approved qualified project generally should not increase when there are decreases in project profitability, or decrease when there are increases in project profitability;

the state’s and affected municipalities’ combined share of the economic rent of the approved qualified project under the contract should be relatively lower in the earlier years than in the later years of the approved qualified project;

the terms should allow the project sponsors to retain a share of the economic rent of the approved qualified project that is sufficient to compensate the sponsors for risks under a range of economic circumstances;

the terms should provide the state and affected municipalities with a significant share of the economic rent of the approved qualified project, when discounted to present value, under favorable price and cost conditions;

the method for calculating the periodic payment in lieu of certain taxes under the contract should be clear and unambiguous; and

while cost calculations for the approved qualified project under the contract should be based on amounts that closely approximate actual costs, agreed-upon formulas reflecting reasonable economic assumptions should be used if possible to promote administrative certainty and efficiency.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the commissioner’s discretion under this section in developing proposed terms for a contract under AS

43.82.020

is not limited to consideration of the economic rent of the approved qualified project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 34 SLA 1999)

Sec. 43.82.220.
Contract terms relating to royalty.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of AS 38, the commissioner of natural resources, with the concurrence of the commissioner of revenue and the affected parties holding a state lease or unit agreement, may develop proposed terms for inclusion in a contract under AS

43.82.020

that modify the timing and notice provisions of the applicable oil and gas leases and unit agreements pertaining to the state’s rights to receive its royalty on gas in kind or in value if

the viability of the approved qualified project depends on long-term gas purchase and sale agreements;

certainty over time regarding the quantity of royalty gas that the state may be taking in kind is needed to secure the long-term purchase and sale agreements;

the specified period of the state’s commitment to take its royalty share in value or in kind does not exceed the term of the purchase and sale agreements; and

the modification does not impair the ability of the approved qualified project or the state to meet the reasonably foreseeable demand in this state for gas within economic proximity of the project during the term of the contract developed under AS

43.82.020

.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of AS 38, the commissioner of natural resources, with the concurrence of the commissioner of revenue and the affected parties holding a state lease or unit agreement, may develop proposed terms for inclusion in a contract under AS

43.82.020

that establish a valuation method for the state’s royalty share of the gas production from an approved qualified project.

The commissioner of revenue shall include any proposed terms relating to royalty developed in accordance with this section in the proposed contract under AS

43.82.400

.

Nothing in this chapter permits modification of the state’s rights that relate to timing, notice, and rights to receive oil royalty in kind or in value under oil and gas leases or unit agreements.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.230.
Contract terms relating to hiring of Alaska residents and contracting with Alaska businesses.

The commissioner shall include in a contract under AS

43.82.020

a term requiring the qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group and contractors of the qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group to comply with all valid federal, state, and municipal laws relating to hiring Alaska residents and contracting with Alaska businesses to work in the state on the approved qualified project and not to discriminate against Alaska residents or Alaska businesses. Within the constraints of law, the commissioner shall also include in a contract under AS

43.82.020

a term that requires the qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group and contractors of the qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group to employ Alaska residents and to contract with Alaska businesses to work in the state on the approved qualified project to the extent the residents and businesses are available, competitively priced, and qualified.

The commissioner shall include in a contract under AS

43.82.020

a term requiring the qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group and contractors of the qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group to

advertise for available positions in newspapers in the location where the work is to be performed and in other publications distributed throughout the state, including in rural areas; and

use Alaska job service organizations located throughout the state and not just in the location where the work is to be performed in order to notify Alaskans of work opportunities on the approved qualified project.

Subject to the voluntary agreement of the qualified sponsor, the commissioner may include a term in the contract providing for incentives to encourage training and hiring of Alaska residents.

This section does not create or abridge individual rights and does not create a private right of action for any person.

For purposes of this section,

“Alaska business” means a firm or contractor that

has held an Alaska business license for the preceding 12 months;

maintains, and has maintained for the preceding 12 months, a place of business in the state that competently and professionally deals in supplies, services, or construction of the nature required for the approved qualified project; and

is

a sole proprietorship and the proprietor is an Alaska resident;

a partnership and more than 50 percent of the partnership interest is held by Alaska residents;

a limited liability company and more than 50 percent of the membership interest is held by Alaska residents;

a corporation that has been incorporated in the state or is authorized to do business in the state; or

a joint venture and a majority of the venturers qualify as Alaska businesses under this paragraph;

“Alaska job service organizations” means those offices maintained by the state and recommended by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development whose functions are to aid the unemployed or underemployed in finding employment;

“Alaska resident” means a natural person who

receives a permanent fund dividend under AS 43.23; or

is registered to vote under AS 15 and qualifies for a resident fishing, hunting, or trapping license under AS 16;

“available,” as applied to an Alaska resident or Alaska business, means that the resident or business is available for employment at the time required and is located anywhere in the state, not just in the area of the state where the work is to be performed;

“qualified,” as applied to an Alaska resident or Alaska business, means that the resident or business possesses the requisite education, training, skills, certification, or experience to perform the work necessary for a particular position or to perform a particular service.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (e) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 43.82.240.
Use of an independent contractor.

The commissioner may use independent contractors to assist in the evaluation of an application or in the development of contract terms under AS

43.82.200

. The commissioner may condition the development of a contract under AS

43.82.020

on an agreement by the applicant to reimburse the state for the reasonable expenses of independent contractors under this section. A reimbursement of expenses that is required in an agreement authorized by this subsection may not exceed $1,500,000 for each application.

An independent contractor selected under this section must sign an agreement regarding confidentiality and disclosures consistent with the determinations made under AS

43.82.310

before the contractor may review information that is determined confidential under AS

43.82.310

.

Selection of an independent contractor under this section is not subject to AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 4 SLA 2003)

Sec. 43.82.250.
Term of contract; effective date.

The term of a contract developed under AS

43.82.020

may be for no longer than is necessary to develop the stranded gas that is subject to the contract; however, the term of the contract may not exceed 35 years from the commencement of commercial operations of the approved qualified project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.260.
Change of parties to an application or a contract; assignment of interests.

A qualified sponsor or member of a qualified sponsor group may assign an interest in or add or withdraw a party to an application under AS

43.82.120

only if the commissioner has

made a finding that the assignment, addition, or withdrawal is consistent with the requirements of AS

43.82.110

; and

given prior written approval for the assignment, addition, or withdrawal.

A contract developed under this chapter may provide for the assignment to or withdrawal of a qualified sponsor or member of a qualified sponsor group.

Upon being added to an application under this section, a party becomes a qualified sponsor or a member of a qualified sponsor group, as appropriate, for the relevant project.

The commissioner may not unreasonably withhold approval under (a) of this section, but may condition the approval in any way reasonably necessary to protect the fiscal interests of the state and to further the purposes of this chapter.

For purposes of this section, an assignment includes a transfer of stock or a partnership interest in a manner that changes control of a qualified sponsor or member of a qualified sponsor group.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.270.
Project plans and work commitments.

A contract under AS

43.82.020

must include the qualified project plan approved under AS

43.82.140

and provisions for updating the plan at reasonable intervals until the commencement of commercial operations of the approved qualified project. The commissioner of revenue, in consultation with the commissioner of natural resources, may, as a term in a contract under AS

43.82.020

, include work commitments or other obligations in the contract to be accomplished before the commencement of commercial operations of the approved qualified project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)